Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-425
Special fishing permits for wards of the state; issuance.

The commission may issue, regardless of any other requirements or qualifications of law, without cost, special fishing permits to wards of the state, on a group basis, for therapeutic purposes, when application has been made to the commission by the head of the appropriate state institution involved.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 135.